Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
SHORT TITLE, PURPOSE, CONSTRUCTION,

GUIDING
PRINCIPLES, AND DEFINITIONS

[§587A-1] Short title. This chapter
shall be known and cited as the Child Protective Act. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next